Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4304
(UDTA 4) Common law and principles of equity.

(UDTA 4) The common law and principles of equity supplement the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act, except to the extent modified by the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act or law of this state other than the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 4.